Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.525

Reorganization of corporations or associations in accordance with this chapter.

Any corporation or association organized under any other statute may be reorganized under the provisions of this chapter by adopting and filing amendments to its articles of incorporation in accordance with the provisions of this chapter for amending articles of incorporation. The articles of incorporation as amended must conform to the requirements of this chapter, and shall state that the corporation accepts the benefits and will be bound by the provisions of this chapter.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 107.]